New York, session 2025-2026, S8195.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Rule 2106 of the civil practice law and rules, as amended 2 by chapter 559 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 3 Rule 2106. Affirmation of truth of statement. (a) The statement of any 4 person wherever made, subscribed and affirmed by that person to be true 5 under the penalties of perjury, other than in a deposition, or an oath 6 of office, or an oath required to be taken before a specified person 7 other than a notary, may be used in an action in New York in lieu of and 8 with the same force and effect as an affidavit, a certificate, a 9 response to a notice to admit, an answer to interrogatories, a verifica- 10 tion of a pleading, a bill of particulars and any other sworn statement. 11 Such affirmation shall be in substantially the following form: 12 I affirm this ___ day of ______, ____, under the penalties of perjury 13 under the laws of New York, which may include a fine or imprisonment, 14 that the foregoing is true, except as to matters alleged on information 15 and belief and as to those matters I believe it to be true, and I under- 16 stand that this document may be filed in an action or proceeding in a 17 court of law. 18 (Signature) 19 (b) Nothing in this rule shall be construed to eliminate any require- 20 ment under the domestic relations law that matrimonial agreements must 21 be acknowledged in the form of deed. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07919-02-5